Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 2

Regulation and Care of Inmates

41-21-201. Duty of warden.

The warden is charged with the duty of treating the inmates with humanity and kindness and protecting them from harsh and cruel treatment and overwork.

Acts 1883, ch. 171, § 3; Shan., § 7498; Code 1932, § 12094; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-301.

Cross-References. Counselors at educational and correctional institutions, qualifications, § 8-50-105.

Humane treatment of prisoners to be provided, Tenn. Const. art. I, § 32.

Medical and welfare services for inmates, §§ 4-6-109 — 4-6-113.

Records of inmates, § 4-6-140.

Unlawful use for private gain, §§ 4-6-138, 4-6-139.

41-21-202. Grading and classification of inmates.

The inmates shall be graded and classified in such a manner as is most conducive to prison discipline and the moral status of the inmates.

Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 4; Shan., § 7520; mod. Code 1932, § 12117; Acts 1972, ch. 576, § 9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-302.

Cross-References. Classification with respect to capacities in prison industries, § 41-22-118.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 2.

41-21-203. Cleanliness and health measures.

The warden shall set forth rules and regulations necessary to promote the health, cleanliness and physical welfare of the inmates.

The warden shall also adopt measures to ensure the cleanliness and sanitary condition of the institution.

Code 1858, § 5508 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 25); impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7527; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12124; Acts 1972, ch. 576, § 11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-306.

41-21-204. Medical and psychological care.

All inmates at their reception and at such times thereafter as may be deemed necessary shall be examined by a physician for the purpose of determining their health status.

The medical director shall conduct a daily outpatient clinic. Any inmate who is ill shall receive proper medical treatment.

The physician shall, acting under and subject to the power of the commissioner of correction, visit the penitentiary in the discharge of duties as often as necessary, prescribe for inmates who are sick, and attend to the regimen, clothing and cleanliness of those who are in the hospital and report to the commissioner any failure on the part of the warden to provide fully for their necessary wants.

The physician shall provide pregnant prisoners and detainees with regular prenatal and postpartum medical care, as necessary.

All prisoners and detainees potentially affected by this subdivision (c)(2) must be advised in writing of the requirements of this subdivision (c)(2), and of § 41-21-227(h), upon admission to the correctional institution and when known to be pregnant.

As used in this subdivision (c)(2):

“Correctional institution” means any facility under the authority of any state, county, or municipal government that has the power to detain or restrain, or both, a person under the laws of this state;

“Detainee” means any person detained under the immigration laws of the United States at any correctional institution;

“Postpartum” means the six-week period, or longer as determined by the healthcare professional responsible for the prisoner or detainee's health care, immediately following delivery, stillbirth, miscarriage, ectopic pregnancy, or other non-live birth outcome;

“Prenatal care” includes pregnancy testing, medical examinations, laboratory and diagnostic tests, including offering HIV testing and prophylaxis when indicated, advice on appropriate levels of activity, safety precautions, nutritional guidance and counseling, routine and high-risk care, management of chemical dependencies, comprehensive counseling and assistance, prescription of appropriate nutritional supplements, and postpartum follow up; and

“Prisoner” means any person incarcerated or detained in any correctional institution who is accused of, convicted of, sentenced for, or adjudicated delinquent for, violations of criminal law or the terms and conditions of parole, probation, pretrial release, or diversionary program.

The physician shall keep a regular journal, to be left in the penitentiary, stating the time of all admissions to the hospital, the nature of the disease, the treatment of each patient, and the time of the patient's discharge from the hospital or of the patient's death.

The physician shall keep a register of all the inmates under the physician's charge, stating their diseases, the cause of the diseases when practicable and the state of their health on entering and leaving the hospital. The physician shall also keep a register of all infirm inmates, giving their names, ages, places of birth and the particular infirmity of each. The register shall always remain in the hospital, open to inspection.

The commissioner may remove the inmates in the penitentiary to such place of security in this state as the commissioner may think best, if, in the commissioner's opinion, the prevalence of any epidemic, infectious or contagious disorder or other urgent occasion renders it expedient and proper.

Any inmate who is sick at the expiration of the term of imprisonment shall not be discharged until the inmate's health is restored, except at the inmate's request.

To the extent necessary, the department of correction may contract with the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities to ensure that psychological services are available at an adequate level and quality for all inmates who are in the department's custody and who are in need of those services but who do not qualify for a transfer from the department of correction as provided in title 33, chapter 3, part 4.

The department of correction shall exercise due diligence to protect the safety of any person rendering psychological services at a departmental facility.

“Psychological services,” as used in this subsection (f), includes evaluation and treatment for chemical dependency, psychological disorders and intellectual disability.

Code 1858, §§ 5461, 5484-5487 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, §§ 14, 23), 5527; Acts 1883, ch. 171, § 24; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., §§ 7478, 7502-7506; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, §§ 12076, 12097-12101; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; Acts 1972, ch. 576, §§ 13, 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-312 — 41-316, 41-318, 41-319; Acts 1986, ch. 483, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 734, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 70; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2020, ch. 762, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (c)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 762, § 3. July 1, 2020.

41-21-205. Censorship of mail.

The commissioner of correction, or the commissioner's designated representative, has the duty and is so empowered to establish rules, regulations and procedures regarding the opening, inspecting and reading of mailable items and letters sent to or from any inmate. The regulations shall be established so as to best promote the health, safety and welfare of all inmates.

Code 1858, § 5525 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 25); Shan., § 7544; Code 1932, § 12142; Acts 1972, ch. 576, § 16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-323.

41-21-206. Access to healthcare products for incarcerated women.

As used in this section:

“Custodian” means the warden of a state correctional facility;

“Healthcare products” includes:

Feminine hygiene products;

Moisturizing soap that is not lye-based;

Toothbrushes;

Toothpaste; and

Any other healthcare product a custodian deems appropriate; and

“State correctional facility” means a state facility or state institution that houses an inmate population under the jurisdiction of the department.

A custodian shall make healthcare products available to all women incarcerated in a state correctional facility at no cost and in a quantity that is appropriate to the needs of the woman without a medical permit. Custodians shall not require that a woman be diagnosed with an illness to access healthcare products. Custodians shall make healthcare products available in housing units and in the medical area of a state correctional facility.

This section does not establish a minimum standard or otherwise create a private right of action concerning the products supplied to a person incarcerated in a state correctional facility.

Acts 2019, ch. 411, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 411, § 2. May 21, 2019.

41-21-207. Work or education of inmates.

All persons sentenced to the penitentiary shall be kept at labor or at school when in sufficient health.

The work of inmates shall be generally from six (6) to eight (8) hours per day during regular work days throughout the year and the number of hours to be worked in the different seasons of the year shall be regulated by the commissioner of correction. For purposes of this section, any hour an inmate attends school each day shall be credited to the hours the inmate must work each day.

Code 1858, § 5502; Acts 1883, ch. 171, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., §§ 7512, 7521; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, §§ 12108, 12118; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-325; Acts 1992, ch. 1022, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 271, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-21-208. Work within and outside prisons.

The inmates shall be worked within the walls of the prison, except when otherwise provided in this code.

The commissioner of correction, with the approval of the governor when it appears to be in the best interests of this state, is authorized to permit inmates to work at other places in this state other than within the walls of the prison. Any other work performed by the inmates shall be in connection with the duties and functions of the various departments, commissions and divisions of state, municipal and county governments and upon property owned or leased to the state of Tennessee or its political subdivisions.

The commissioner is authorized to make any rules, regulations and conditions that the commissioner deems necessary and advisable in connection with the performance of such work by inmates.

Code 1858, § 5532; Shan., § 7551; mod. Code 1932, § 12150; Acts 1963, ch. 180, § 2; 1970, ch. 391, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-326.

Cross-References. Roster of inmate release privileges, title 41, ch. 21, part 7.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Pardon and Parole, § 7.

41-21-209. Murderers and rapists not to work outside.

No inmate under sentence for the crime of murder or rape shall be worked or hired outside of the prison bounds of the penitentiary, unless by the direction of the commissioner of correction.

Acts 1883, ch. 171, § 13; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7513; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12109; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-327.

41-21-210. Employment adapted to inmate's condition.

The particular employment of each inmate shall be such as is best adapted to the inmate's age, sex and state of health, having due regard to that employment that is most profitable.

Code 1858, § 5504 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 25); Shan., § 7523; mod. Code 1932, § 12120; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-328.

41-21-211. Bibles furnished.

Each inmate shall be provided with a Bible, which the inmate may be permitted to peruse in the inmate's cell at such times as the inmate is not required to perform prison labor.

Code 1858, § 5510 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 25); Shan., § 7529; Code 1932, § 12126; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-329.

41-21-212 — 41-21-215.
[Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 41-21-212 — 41-21-215 (Acts 1931, ch. 89, §§ 1, 2; 1943, ch. 144, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 11780.1, 11780.2 (Williams, §§ 12209.1, 12209.2); Acts 1953, ch. 164, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 805, §§ 5-8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-332 — 41-335; Acts 1984, ch. 982, § 2), concerning grading of prisoners, were repealed by Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 14, but the department of correction is authorized to continue their application pursuant to § 41-21-236(g).

Former § 41-21-212 read: “41-21-212. Good behavior allowance. — (a) Each convict who shall demean himself uprightly shall have deducted from the time for which he may have been sentenced, one (1) month for the first year, two (2) months for the second year, three (3) months for each subsequent year until the tenth year inclusive and four (4) months for each remaining year of the time of imprisonment. This shall apply to prisoners in confinement or on parole therefrom.

“(b) This section shall apply only to those persons convicted of an offense committed before July 1, 1981, and then only until such good behavior allowances are converted into good conduct sentence credits pursuant to § 41-21-231.”

Former § 41-21-213 read: “41-21-213. Grading of prisoners — Record of conduct — Grade privileges. — (a) It shall be the duty of the wardens of all the state penitentiaries to keep a correct record of the conduct of each inmate and under the rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner of correction to establish grades of the inmates. The commissioner of correction shall have authority to fix the privileges that will be permitted to the prisoners of each grade.

“(b) The conduct record shall become the basis for the allowance of ‘good time.’

“(c) This section shall apply only to those persons convicted of an offense committed before July 1, 1981, and then only until such good behavior allowances are converted into good conduct sentence credits pursuant to § 41-21-231.”

Former § 41-21-214 read: “41-21-214. Honor grade — Time allowance. — (a)(1) The said commissioner of correction shall have the right and power to establish an honor grade in which convicts shall be placed when received at the prison.

“(2) The allowance for honor grade shall be two (2) months of each year of the term of service.

“(b) This section shall apply only to those persons convicted of an offense committed before July 1, 1981, and then only until such honor grade time allowances are converted into good conduct earned sentence credits pursuant to § 41-21-231.”

Former § 41-21-215 read: “41-21-215. Violations by honor prisoners. — (a) Should any prisoner who has been placed in the honor grade violate the rules and regulations of the prison or otherwise demean himself improperly, the commissioner of correction is authorized to remove him from the honor grade and take away the whole or any part of the honor time of said person. For the same consideration, the commissioner of correction is authorized to take away the whole or any part of the good time of said person.

“(b) This section shall apply only to those persons convicted of an offense committed before July 1, 1981, and then only until such honor grade time allowances are converted into good conduct earned sentence credits pursuant to § 41-21-231.”

41-21-216. Custody of prisoners' personal belongings and funds.

It is lawful for the warden of the penitentiary, acting under and subject to the power of the commissioner of correction, to take charge of any property in the possession of any of the inmates at the time of their entering the prison, and, on the application of the inmate, to sue for and receive any goods, chattels or money due or belonging to that inmate and to keep a correct account of such goods, chattels or money.

The money or property thus received shall be held subject to the order of the inmate upon discharge, or to the inmate's legal representative in case of death, subject at first to the payment of all costs that may have been adjudged against the inmate and the expenses of keeping the inmate, if any, over the value of the inmate's work.

If no demand is made for the money by the inmate, or a legally authorized agent or personal representative within six (6) months after the inmate's death or discharge, the amount on hand shall be paid by the warden through the commissioner into the state treasury.

The warden shall also cause the clothes of each inmate, when received into the penitentiary, to be washed and carefully put away, and shall place a ticket with the inmate's name on the clothes, to be returned to the inmate on the inmate's discharge; or, if the inmate prefers, to dispose of them to the best advantage, and retain the money, to be paid as provided in subsection (b).

Code 1858, §§ 5477-5480 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, §§ 17, 35); Shan., §§ 7493-7496; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, §§ 12088-12091; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-336 — 41-339.

41-21-217. Funds subject to fines and costs.

The funds received by the warden under § 41-21-216 are subject to the satisfaction of any judgment for fine and costs rendered against the inmate upon pronouncing sentence and to the expense of keeping the inmate, if any, over and above the inmate's labor.

Code 1858, § 5481 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 17); Shan., § 7497; Code 1932, § 12092; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-340.

41-21-218. Notice of rules to inmates.

Regulations provided for in this part, with all others adopted by the general assembly or the commissioner in reference to the police and government of the penitentiary, which it is necessary that the inmates should know, together with the provisions of part 4 of this chapter, §§ 39-12-103, 39-13-304, 39-16-201, 39-16-402, 39-16-403, title 39, chapter 16, part 6 in relation to escapes, and § 39-17-303, shall be printed so as to be conveniently read and set up by the warden, in a conspicuous place, and also read and explained by the warden to each inmate upon admission to the penitentiary.

Code 1858, § 5524 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 26); impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7543; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12141; Acts 1972, ch. 576, § 18; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-341; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 40.

41-21-219. Clothing, money and transportation furnished on discharge.

Each inmate housed at a department of correction institution, at the discretion of the commissioner of correction, shall be furnished at the inmate's release, either on parole or probation pursuant to § 40-20-206 or § 40-35-501(a) or when discharged without further supervision, with appropriate clothing and with an amount of money not to exceed thirty dollars ($30.00) for an inmate leaving on parole or probation and an amount not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for an inmate who is discharged without further supervision. Each inmate who is paroled or placed on probation pursuant to § 40-20-206 or § 40-35-501(a) will also be provided with a nontransferable ticket for the cheapest available means of transportation to the inmate's approved parole or probation residence when private transportation is not available. A parole or probation violator who is re-released within three (3) months following the violator's return to the custody of the department shall be ineligible to receive any release provisions.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the commissioner's ability or discretion in enacting policies or undertaking rehabilitative, anti-recidivism, or reentry assistance programs for probationers or parolees.

Code 1858, § 5528; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7527; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12145; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 12145; Acts 1972, ch. 654, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-342; Acts 1988, ch. 570, § 2; 1991, ch. 77, § 1; 2014, ch. 558, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

41-21-220. Report of injuries and deaths.

The warden at the main prison or any branch prison or mine where any inmate meets with sudden death or physical injury by means of violence or accident shall, within ten (10) days after the occurrence of death or physical injury, report the death or injury to the commissioner of correction, together with a detailed statement under oath of all the facts and circumstances bearing upon the death or injury.

Acts 1889, ch. 204, § 19; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 1; Shan., § 7491; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12086; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-343.

41-21-221. Examination and burial of deceased prisoners.

Whenever any inmate dies in the penitentiary, the warden shall forthwith notify the commissioner of correction, if practicable, and summon at least one (1) licensed physician of the county of the prison to examine the body of the deceased, whose duty it is to attend and ascertain, as nearly as may be, the cause of death, and report the cause to the commissioner. The warden shall not permit the body to be buried until that examination is made.

If the body is not applied for by the friends of the deceased, nor for medical and surgical science under the provisions of the law, within a convenient time after the examination, the warden shall have it decently interred in the burying place provided for the penitentiary.

Code 1858, §§ 5529, 5530; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1899, ch. 206; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., §§ 7548, 7549; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, §§ 12147, 12148; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102; 1972, ch. 576, § 19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-344, 41-345.

Cross-References. Bodies used for scientific purposes, title 68, ch. 4.

Summons of relatives, § 68-4-101.

41-21-222. Mental examination of persons eligible for release or parole.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services, as soon as it is properly staffed and equipped to examine all persons eligible for release or about to be paroled from the penal institutions of the state, upon the request of the commissioner of correction, shall examine all such persons with the view of determining whether the persons are mentally ill or have symptoms of mental illness and report its findings to the commissioner of correction.

Acts 1955, ch. 204, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-348; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 69; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

41-21-223. Complaint for judicial commitment of person scheduled for release to hospital or treatment resource — Stay of release pending completion of hearing.

If the commissioner of correction determines from an examination that a person who is in the custody of the department of correction has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance and because of the mental illness or serious emotional disturbance poses a substantial likelihood of serious harm, as defined in § 33-6-501, then the commissioner shall, no less than thirty (30) days before the person's scheduled release from a correctional facility, file a complaint with the clerk of the court that has jurisdiction under § 33-3-603 for the judicial commitment of the person to a hospital or treatment resource pursuant to title 33, chapter 6, part 5. The clerk shall serve to the person a copy of the complaint pursuant to § 33-3-605, and shall send a copy of the complaint to the district attorney general with jurisdiction in that district. A complaint filed under this section stays the release of the person pending completion of a hearing pursuant to title 33, chapter 3, part 6.

Acts 1955, ch. 204, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; 1977, ch. 387, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-349; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 8C; 2019, ch. 504, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “If the director of an institution of the department of correction determines from an examination that any person is mentally ill and because of this illness possesses a likelihood of serious harm as defined in title 33, chapter 6, part 5, the director may, within one (1) month of the time for the release of that person, petition the chancery or circuit court in the county where the institution is located, or division II of probate court in any county having a probate court and having a population of more than six hundred thousand (600,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, where the institution is located, for judicial commitment to a hospital or treatment resource pursuant to title 33, chapter 6, part 5.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 504, § 2. July 1, 2019.

41-21-224. Notice of release of inmate.

Whenever any inmate is released by reason of the expiration of the inmate's term of imprisonment from the penitentiary, the warden shall immediately give written notice of the release to the sheriff of the county and the chief of police of the municipality to which the inmate will return and to the district attorney general of the judicial district to which the inmate will return.

The notice shall clearly state:

The name of the inmate;

The offense for which the inmate was convicted;

The date of the conviction;

The date of the inmate's release; and

When conviction is based on a morals charge, the nature of the charge.

Acts 1955, ch. 156, § 1; 1977, ch. 320, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-353; Acts 1988, ch. 999, § 2; 1999, ch. 392, §§ 1-3.

Cross-References. Notification to kidnapping hostages or victims of convict's release on parole or probation, §§ 40-11-106, 40-11-113, 40-28-107.

Roster of inmate release privileges, title 41, ch. 21, part 7.

Law Reviews.

Updating Tennessee's Public Records Law (Douglas Pierce), 24 No. 5, Tenn. B.J. 24 (1988).

41-21-225. Registration of parolees.

All persons released on parole shall immediately register in person or by the probation and parole officer with the sheriff of the county and the chief of police of the city to which the inmate is to be released.

Acts 1955, ch. 156, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-354; Acts 1998, ch. 1049, § 62.

Cross-References. Roster of inmate release privileges, title 41, ch. 21, part 7.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-21-226. Evaluation of inmates.

Every inmate committed to a state penal institution shall be evaluated as to educational level and ability to learn. The report shall be made in writing by the diagnostic and classification center.

It is the duty of the commissioner of correction or the commissioner's designee to establish policy and programs that will bring the communication skills of the inmates up to an acceptable level.

The commissioner shall, at the commissioner's discretion, require all inmates to attend educational classes necessary to bring about the desired results.

Acts 1972, ch. 576, § 21; T.C.A., § 41-355.

Cross-References. Counselors of correctional institutions, qualifications, § 8-50-105.

41-21-227. Grant of furloughs to inmates.

The department of correction is authorized and empowered to grant furloughs to the inmates in the adult correction institutions administered and operated by the department.

Furloughs shall be granted under the rules and regulations prescribed and promulgated by the commissioner of correction or the commissioner's designated representative.

All furloughs shall be made on an individual basis under reasonable conditions to inmates:

In the event of serious illness or death of a member of the inmate's immediate family;

Who have been recommended for parole by the parole board;

Who have ninety (90) days remaining before release on mandatory parole; or

Who have ninety (90) days remaining before release without parole.

Furloughs will be for a maximum of three (3) days, except extensions may be authorized by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee when an inmate is unable to return within the specified time through no fault of the inmate or when an emergency exists.

Inmates granted a furlough under subsections (b) through subdivision (d)(1) shall receive a maximum of three (3) nonconsecutive furloughs, and each furlough shall be authorized only for the purpose of securing employment and a place of residence upon release from confinement. Furloughs shall be made only to those inmates with a record of behavior and conduct as to be worthy of this privilege.

Whenever a furlough is granted to an inmate under the authority of this section, the department shall notify the chief law enforcement officer of the county in which the inmate resides that the inmate has been granted a furlough.

Furloughs may also be granted to inmates on the work release or educational release programs. These furloughs will be for a maximum of two (2) days and shall be granted under the rules and regulations prescribed and promulgated by the commissioner.

Furloughs may also be granted to inmates who serve as inmate staff at state operated, minimum security correctional institutions that are primarily utilized to house inmates who participate in the work release restitutional release and educational release programs.

The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall prescribe and promulgate rules and regulations to establish guidelines for issuance of all furloughs authorized by subdivision (g)(1). These guidelines shall establish such limitations and conditions as may be necessary to ensure that issuance of the furloughs does not jeopardize the security of the citizenry or otherwise threaten community acceptance and support of the work release, restitutional release and educational release programs.

The department is authorized and empowered to grant furloughs to female inmates for any period of up to six (6) months to permit the giving of birth and the bonding between mother and child. If the pregnancy occurs while the female inmate is incarcerated, she shall not be eligible for furlough. No furlough pursuant to this subdivision (h)(1) shall be granted without the advance consent of the sentencing judge or the judge's successor. Furthermore, no such furlough shall be granted where there is good reason to believe that the release of a designated inmate will present a serious threat to the safety of the public or of escape by the inmate. The term of the furlough shall not be credited against the sentence that the inmate was serving so as to reduce the length of the sentence. The department shall not be responsible for any expenses, medical or otherwise, incurred by the inmate while on furlough. Where the furlough is not being used for the purpose granted, it may be revoked upon the written order of the commissioner and the inmate may be retaken into custody.

The department shall notify the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives of the release of any person on such furlough at the same time the furlough is granted. The notice shall include, but not be limited to, the name of the person released, the rationale for releasing the person and the period for which the furlough will be effective.

The department is authorized to take all steps necessary for the formulation of rules and regulations to implement this subsection (h).

Irrespective of any other restriction imposed by this section, upon the medical recommendation of the departmental director of medical services, accompanied by a notarized report of the attending physician and the security recommendation of the head of the institution in which the inmate is held, the commissioner may grant a furlough of indeterminate duration to eligible inmates.

Subdivision (i)(1) applies only to:

Inmates who, due to their medical condition, are in imminent peril of death; and

Inmates who can no longer take care of themselves in a prison environment due to severe physical or psychological deterioration.

This subdivision (i)(2) applies only to those inmates who can be released into the community without substantial risk that they will commit a crime while on furlough. The commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, is empowered to make the release subject to any reasonable conditions.

If, subsequent to the inmate's release, the inmate's condition improves so that the inmate is no longer in imminent peril of death or so that the inmate can adequately care for the inmate's own health in the prison environment, the inmate shall be returned, by order of the commissioner, to the institution from which the inmate was released. The inmate may be ordered to be returned to that institution if the inmate breaks any conditions of the furlough granted.

The department shall notify the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives of the release of any person on such furlough at the same time the furlough is granted. The notice shall include, but not be limited to, the name of the person released, the rationale for releasing the person and the period for which the furlough will be effective.

The department is authorized to take all steps necessary for the formulation of rules and regulations to implement this subsection (i).

Furloughs for inmates who need to enter another state will be governed by the Tennessee Interstate Furlough Compact, compiled in chapter 23, part 2 of this title.

Furloughs may also be granted to inmates assigned to a community service center and classified minimum trustee. These furloughs shall not exceed more than twelve (12) hours in duration nor shall any inmate be entitled to more than one (1) furlough under this subsection (k) each month.

Acts 1972, ch. 558, §§ 1-4; 1976, ch. 820, §§ 1-4; 1978, ch. 795, § 1; 1978, ch. 874, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 186, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 720, § 1; 1981, ch. 344, §§ 1-3, 5; T.C.A., § 41-356; Acts 1987, ch. 231, § 11; 1988, ch. 570, § 3; 1988, ch. 927, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Furlough program, conditions for furlough, §§ 41-2-142, 41-2-143.

Grant of furloughs to inmates, § 41-21-227.

Release eligibility status calculation, § 40-35-501.

Retaking of prisoners absconding from work release or violating furlough agreements, § 41-1-117.

Roster of inmate release privileges, title 41, ch. 21, part 7.

Work release programs, litter removal, § 41-2-149.